South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4267.
do enact, constitute, and frame, such just and equal Laws, Ordinances, Acts, Constitutions, and Offices, from time to time, as shall be thought most meet and convenient for the general Good of the Colony; unto which we promise all due Submission and Obedience. IN WITNESS whereof we have hereunto subscribed our names at Cape-Cod the eleventh of November, in the Reign of our Sovereign Lord King James, of England, France, and Ireland, the eighteenth, and of Scotland the fifty-fourth, Anno Domini; 1620." Now, therefore, Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Mayflower Compact Day SECTION 1.    Chapter 3, Title 53 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 53-3-320.    The twenty-first day of November of each year is designated as "Mayflower Compact Day" in South Carolina. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 20th day of May, 2025. Approved the 22nd day of May, 2025. __________